Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201679-4,122
Public hearings; record; notice.

Before any plan of reorganization is approved by the state committee pursuant to the Learning Community Reorganization Act, the state committee shall hold one or more public hearings. At such hearings, the state committee shall hear any and all persons interested with respect to the areas of consideration listed in section 79-4,121. The state committee shall keep a record of all hearings in the formulation or approval of plans for the reorganization of school districts. Notice of such public hearings of the state committee shall be given by publication in a legal newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties in which the affected districts are located at least ten days prior to such hearing.

Laws 2006, LB 1024, § 33;

Laws 2016, LB1067, § 22.
July 21, 2016